Utah statutes.
39-4-12.   Military court law and rules of National Guard applicable -- Privilege from arrest, posse comitatus, and jury service.

(1)  When the forces or any part of them are ordered out for active service or are serving as members of the Utah State Defense Force, the Utah Code of Military Justice, as it applies to the state National Guard, and regulations prescribed under it apply to the Utah State Defense Force.

(2)  Members of the Utah State Defense Force are privileged from arrest under Section 39-1-54, when in state service.

(3)  Persons serving in the Utah State Defense Force are, during this service, exempt from posse comitatus and from jury duty.



Amended by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

